Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-505
Sinking fund.

Such sum so levied and collected shall constitute a special fund for the purposes for which the same was voted and shall not be used for any other purpose, and shall be kept by the county treasurer separate and apart from the other county funds.

Laws 1895, c. 27, § 5, p. 130;

R.S.1913, § 440;

C.S.1922, § 357;

C.S.1929, § 11-705;

R.S.1943, § 23-505.